Arkansas statutes. Title 18 Property
Chapter 40

Mortgages

Cross References.

Loans secured by liens on agricultural lands, §23-32-203.

Recording in recorder's office, §14-15-401 et seq.

Effective Dates.

Acts 1877, No. 22, § 2: effective on passage.

Acts 1891, No. 7, § 2: effective on passage.

Acts 1917, No. 374, § 5: Mar. 24, 1917. Emergency declared.

Acts 1955, No. 101, § 5: Feb. 23, 1955. Emergency clause provided: “The General Assembly finds it to be a fact, and so declares, that many instruments contain defective acknowledgments due to errors in the preparation thereof, without fault upon the part of the person, firm or corporation so executing said instruments; that these defective acknowledgments hamper the sale of real estate throughout the State and retard the development of industries and other businesses in the State of Arkansas; that this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1961, No. 185, § 10-101: effective midnight on Dec. 31, 1961.

Acts 1973, No. 604, § 4: Apr. 5, 1973. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the provisions of Section 1 of Act No. 260 of 1911 relating to the methods of giving notice that payment has been made upon an existing indebtedness are at this time inadequate and should be enlarged, as the present provisions for the giving of such notice are unduly restrictive, are a deterrent to the obtaining of financing for agricultural, commercial and industrial purposes in the State of Arkansas, and that it is immediately necessary to correct this undesirable situation. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act shall be in effect from the date of its passage and approval.”

Acts 2015, No. 918, § 2: Apr. 1, 2015. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that historically low interest rates make conditions favorable for the citizens of this state to obtain financing to purchase or refinance a home; that the ability to close the purchase or refinance of a home at a favorable interest rate can save citizens thousands of dollars on one of their largest and most important investments; that delays due to the failure to timely release a mortgage after the mortgage has been paid can result in immediate and substantial harm; that due to mortgage industry practices it can be extremely difficult to locate the proper lender to obtain a mortgage release and therefore an immediate need exists to provide an alternative method to obtain the release. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is
overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

18-40-101. Proof or acknowledgment — Recording.

All mortgages of real estate shall be proven or acknowledged in the same manner that deeds for the conveyance of real estate are required by law to be proven or acknowledged. When so proven or acknowledged they shall be recorded in the counties in which the lands lie.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 101, § 1; Acts 1877, No. 22, § 1, p. 17; 1891, No. 7, § 1, p. 6; C. & M. Dig., § 7380; Pope's Dig., § 9434; Acts 1961, No. 185, § 10-102(2); A.S.A. 1947, § 51-1001.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1846, § 3, p. 77, and Acts 1846, § 3, p. 108, provided that nothing contained in the acts would be construed to change, or in any manner affect, §§14-15-411,18-40-101, and18-40-102.

18-40-102. Lien attaches when recorded.

Every mortgage of real estate shall be a lien on the mortgaged property from the time it is filed in the recorder's office for record, and not before. The filing shall be notice to all persons of the existence of the mortgage.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 101, § 2; C. & M. Dig., § 7381; Pope's Dig., § 9435; Acts 1961, No. 185, § 10-102(3); A.S.A. 1947, § 51-1002.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1846, § 3, p. 77, and Acts 1846, § 3, p. 108, provided that nothing contained in the acts would be construed to change, or in any manner affect, §§14-15-411,18-40-101, and18-40-102.

18-40-103. Extension of maturity date.

(a)(1)

No agreement for the extension of the date of maturity of the whole, or any part, of any debt or note secured by mortgage, deed of trust, or vendor's lien or for the renewal thereof, whether made in writing or otherwise, and no written or oral acknowledgment of indebtedness thereon, shall operate, so far as it affects the rights of third parties, to revive the debts or extend the operation of the statute of limitations with reference thereto, unless the parties execute and acknowledge a written agreement setting forth the terms of the extension or renewal and the description of the property affected and record it in the office of the recorder of the county in which the property is located, or unless a memorandum showing the extension or renewal is endorsed on the margin of the record where the instrument is recorded, which endorsement shall be attested and dated by the clerk.

(2)(A)

In counties which use other than paper recording systems, all marginal endorsements entered after December 31, 1995, are void.

(B)

The clerks in counties which use other than paper recording systems shall not allow any marginal endorsements to be made after December 31, 1995, and shall not attest or date any marginal endorsements after December 31, 1995.

(b)

In all cases of existing recorded mortgages, deeds of trust, or deeds barred by the terms of this section, or when the debt retains liens, when the debt or liability would be barred by the terms of this section, the party in whose favor the debt or liability exists shall be allowed one (1) year from the date of the debt or liability to bring action to enforce it.

History.

Acts 1917, No. 374, § 1; C. & M. Dig., § 7382; Pope's Dig., § 9436; Acts 1973, No. 604, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 51-1010; Acts 1995, No. 1025, § 1.

Cross References.

Tolling statute of limitations, notation of payments made in margin, §18-49-101.

18-40-104. Acknowledgment of satisfaction on record.

(a)

If a mortgagee or his or her executor, administrator, or assignee receives full satisfaction for the amount due on any mortgage, then at the request of the person making satisfaction, the mortgagee shall acknowledge satisfaction of the amount due on the mortgage on the margin of the record in which the mortgage is recorded.

(b)

Acknowledgment of satisfaction, made as stated in subsection (a) of this section, shall have the effect to release the mortgage, bar all actions brought on the mortgage, and revest in the mortgagor or his or her legal representative all title to the mortgaged property.

(c)

The trustee of a deed of trust or a person employed by the trustee shall reconvey all or any part of the property encumbered by a deed of trust to the person entitled to the property on written request of the beneficiary of the deed of trust for a reasonable fee plus costs.

(d)

If a person receiving satisfaction does not, within sixty (60) days after being requested, acknowledge satisfaction as stated in subsection (a) of this section or request the trustee to reconvey the property as stated in subsection (c) of this section, he or she shall forfeit to the party aggrieved any sum not exceeding the amount of the mortgage money, to be recovered by a civil action in any court of competent jurisdiction.

(e)

If a person receiving satisfaction does not, within sixty (60) days after being requested, acknowledge satisfaction as stated in subsection (a) of this section or fails to cause the trustee to reconvey the property as stated in subsection (c) of this section, then, in addition to the rights provided in subsection (d) of this section, a satisfaction affidavit may be recorded in the county where the lien is recorded which shall have the same effect as an acknowledgment of satisfaction as stated in subsection (b) of this section or a reconveyance of the property as stated in subsection (c) of this section.

(f)

A satisfaction affidavit may be executed and recorded by a:

(1)

Licensed attorney who prepared the original mortgage or deed of trust;

(2)

Licensed attorney who represents the person making or having received satisfaction; or

(3)

Licensed title agent employed by a title company that tendered the satisfaction on behalf of the person making satisfaction.

(g)

A satisfaction affidavit shall:

(1)

Be sworn to and acknowledged before a person authorized to administer an oath under the laws of this state;

(2)

Conspicuously identify in its title that it is a “Satisfaction Affidavit”; and

(3)

Contain the following information concerning the satisfaction:

(A)

The names of all parties to the original instrument;

(B)

The recording information, including the recording date of the original instrument;

(C)

The date of payment and the amount paid to satisfy the indebtedness; and

(D)

That more than sixty (60) days have elapsed since the request for the acknowledgement of satisfaction.

(h)

A satisfaction affidavit may be prepared in substantially the following form:

“SATISFACTION AFFIDAVIT

KNOW ALL PERSONS BY THESE PRESENTS that:

I, [Name of Affiant], am the [Attorney for the Mortgagor or Employee of a Title Company that Tendered the Satisfaction on Behalf of the Mortgagor].

[Name of Mortgagor] mortgaged certain real property to [Name of Mortgagee] to secure the original principal indebtedness of [Amount of Indebtedness] which was evidenced by that certain [Name of Instrument] recorded on [Date] in the real property records of [Name of County] County, Arkansas, as [Instrument Number or Book and Page].

On [Date], [Name of Mortgagor] tendered to [Name of Mortgagee] the sum of [Amount of Satisfaction], which sum represents the full satisfaction of the amount due on the [Name of Instrument]. [Name of Mortgagor] requested from [Name of Mortgagee] an acknowledgment of satisfaction on [Date]. More than sixty (60) days have elapsed since the request of the acknowledgement of satisfaction.

Further affiant sayeth naught.

WITNESS my hand and seal on this
day of
, 20

[Signature]

Name printed: ACKNOWLEDGMENT STATE OF } }ss. COUNTY OF }

Click to view table.

On this
day of
, 20
, before me, a Notary Public in and for the said county and state, personally appeared
, to me well known, and acknowledged that [he/she] had executed the foregoing document for the consideration, uses, and purposes therein mentioned and set forth.

IN WITNESS WHEREOF, I hereunto set my hand and official seal.

Notary Public

My Commission Expires:
”.

(i)

A satisfaction affidavit that complies with this section in substantially the form provided by subsection (h) of this section or in a custom form shall be:

(1)

Recorded by the county recorder in the land records of the county where the real property is located; and

(2)

Indexed by the county recorder in the same manner as an acknowledgment of satisfaction.

(j)(1)

Subsections (a) and (b) of this section do not apply in a county which uses a system other than a paper recording system.

(2)

The clerk in a county which uses a system other than a paper recording system shall not allow a satisfaction by a marginal notation after December 31, 1995.

(3)

A satisfaction by a marginal notation made in a county which uses a system other than a paper recording system after December 31, 1995, is void.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 101, §§ 18-20; C. & M. Dig., §§ 7395-7397; Pope's Dig., §§ 9452-9454; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 51-1011 — 51-1013; Acts 1995, No. 1025, § 2; 2005, No. 1945, § 1; 2015, No. 918, § 1.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

As enacted by Acts 1995, No. 1025, § 2, subdivision (d)(1) began:

“Effective January 1, 1996,”.

The 2015 amendment added a “period” to the Satisfaction Affidavit of subsection (h) without markup.

Amendments.

The 2005 amendment inserted present (c) and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly; in present (d), inserted “or request the trustee to reconvey the property as stated in subsection (c) of this section”; and, in present (e)(1), substituted “Subsections (a) and (b) of this section do not” for “This section does not.”

The 2015 amendment inserted (e)-(i), and redesignated former (e) as (j).

18-40-105. Certification upon payment before sale.

If mortgaged property is redeemed by payment to the officer before the sale, the officer shall make a certificate thereof and acknowledge it before some officer authorized to take acknowledgment of deeds for lands. The certificate shall be recorded in the office in which the mortgage is recorded and shall have the same effect as satisfaction entered on the margin of the record.

History.

Rev. Stat., ch. 101, § 21; C. & M. Dig., § 7398; Pope's Dig., § 9455; A.S.A. 1947, § 51-1015.

18-40-106. Sufficiency of satisfaction — Transfer or assignment.

(a)(1)

Satisfaction of any mortgage, deed of trust, vendor's lien, or lien retained in deed or note made and endorsed on the margin of the record where the instrument is recorded by the mortgagee, trustee, beneficiary, agent of the owner of record of the indebtedness, or by the owner of record thereof, shall be full and complete protection for any subsequent purchaser, mortgagee, or judgment creditor of the mortgagor or grantor, unless there shall appear on the margin of the record where the instrument is recorded a memorandum showing that the mortgage, deed of trust, vendor's lien, lien retained in deed or note, or other evidence of indebtedness secured thereby has been transferred or assigned.

(2)

The memorandum shall be signed by the transferor or assignor, giving the name of the transferee or assignee, together with the date of the transfer or assignment, the signature to be attested and dated by the clerk.

(b)

Where it shall appear from a memorandum endorsed upon the margin of the record and attested as provided in subsection (a) of this section that the mortgage, deed of trust, vendor's lien, or other evidence of indebtedness has been transferred, satisfaction shall be made by the party appearing therein as the transferee.

(c)(1)

This section does not apply in counties which use other than paper recording systems.

(2)

The clerks in counties that use other than paper recording systems shall not allow any marginal endorsements to be made after December 31, 1995.

(3)

In counties which use other than paper recording systems, marginal endorsements made after December 31, 1995, are void.

History.

Acts 1917, No. 374, § 2; C. & M. Dig., § 7399; Pope's Dig., § 9456; A.S.A. 1947, § 51-1016; Acts 1995, No. 1025, § 3.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

As enacted by Acts 1995, No. 1025, § 3, subdivision (c)(1) began:

“Effective January 1, 1996,”.

18-40-107. Attestation of satisfaction — Separate release.

(a)

In all cases in which the party receiving satisfaction of any indebtedness secured by mortgage, deed of trust, or lien affecting real estate is required by law to acknowledge it on the margin of the record, the satisfaction shall be signed by the party and his or her signature shall be attested and dated by the clerk. The attestation by the clerk shall be evidence of the facts recited therein.

(b)

The effectual discharge of any lien, deed of trust, or mortgage lien in note, bond, or other instrument may be made by a separate release deed or instrument duly executed, acknowledged, and recorded. This instrument when so recorded shall be of the same effect as a marginal entry.

(c)(1)

Subsection (a) of this section does not apply in counties which use other than paper recording systems.

(2)

In counties which use other than paper recording systems, the clerks shall not allow marginal notations of satisfaction of any indebtedness after December 31, 1995.

(3)

In counties which use other than paper recording systems, marginal notations made after December 31, 1995, are void.

History.

Acts 1917, No. 374, § 3; C. & M. Dig., § 7400; Pope's Dig., § 9457; A.S.A. 1947, § 51-1017; Acts 1995, No. 1025, § 4.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

As enacted by Acts 1995, No. 1025, § 4, subdivision (c)(1) began:

“Effective January 1, 1996,”.

18-40-108. Validation of prior releases.

(a)

All releases of mortgages, liens, liens under deeds of trust, vendor's liens, or other liens appearing upon the record, either upon the margin of the record of the instrument reserving the lien or by separate instrument upon the record, when appearing upon the record as of the date of the passage of this act, shall be valid and effectual as a release of the lien as fully as if executed by the person entitled to release it whether the releases purport to be executed by the:

(1)

Mortgagee, trustee, or the beneficiary in the lien;

(2)

Agent or attorney of the mortgagee, trustee, or beneficiary;

(3)

Circuit clerk or his or her deputy;

(4)

Assignee of any notes secured by the liens; or

(5)

Assignee of the instrument reserving a lien.

(b)(1)

The clerks in counties which use other than paper recording systems shall not allow marginal releases to be entered after December 31, 1995.

(2)

Marginal releases entered after December 31, 1995, are void.

History.

Acts 1955, No. 101, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 51-1018; Acts 1995, No. 1025, § 5.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1955, No. 101, § 2, provided, in part, that any person owning notes secured by the liens or who may be otherwise entitled to assert rights contrary to the releases should be permitted to bring suit for the purpose of cancelling the release or asserting rights contrary thereto, if improperly made, within six months from the passage of this act and not thereafter.

In reference to the term “date of passage of this act”, Acts 1955, No. 101, was signed by the Governor on February 23, 1955, and became effective on June 9, 1955.

For prior validating acts see Acts 1917, No. 371, § 1; Acts 1937, No. 352, § 2; Acts 1941, No. 422, § 2; and Acts 1949, No. 291, § 2.

Meaning of “this act”.

Acts 1955, No. 101, codified as §§18-40-108 and16-47-108.

18-40-109. Transfer, etc., by separate instrument.

(a)(1)

No provision contained in §§18-40-103,18-40-106,18-40-107, and this section shall prevent any mortgagee, trustee, agent of owner of record, or the owner of record, transferee, or assignee appearing of record, from selling, transferring, or assigning any deed of trust, mortgage, or vendor's lien retained in deed by separate instrument duly acknowledged and recorded.

(2)

At the time of recording any separate instrument transferring any mortgage, deed of trust, vendor's lien, or lien retained in deed, note, bond, or other instrument, the clerk and ex officio recorder in the office in which the transfer or assignment shall appear shall note on the margin of the record of the original mortgage, deed of trust, or deed retaining vendor's lien a memorandum noting that the lien contained in the instrument, and the notes or other instruments evidenced thereby, have been transferred, to whom transferred, the date of the transfer, and the book and page where the separate instrument and transfer may be found.

(3)

The failure of the clerk and ex officio recorder to make the marginal entry or notation shall not invalidate the sale, transfer, or assignment recorded as provided in this section.

(b)(1)

The clerks in counties which use other than paper recording systems shall not allow any assignment by marginal notation after December 31, 1995.

(2)

Any such marginal notation entered after December 31, 1995, is void.

History.

Acts 1917, No. 374, § 4; C. & M. Dig., § 7394; Pope's Dig., § 9451; A.S.A. 1947, § 51-1019; Acts 1995, No. 1025, § 6.

18-40-110. Recording by public utilities covering property situated in more than one county.

(a)

Every mortgage, deed of trust, and instrument supplementary thereto, amendatory thereof, or in satisfaction thereof, covering any real property situated in more than one (1) county in this state and made by a corporation subject to regulation by the Arkansas Public Service Commission, or its successor, shall be executed and acknowledged in the manner provided by law and may be recorded or filed in the office of the Secretary of State, but the recording or filing is not mandatory.

(b)

The recording or filing of the instrument in the office of the Secretary of State shall be notice to all subsequent purchasers and encumbrancers of the rights and interests of the parties thereto as to property described in the recorded or filed instrument.

(c)

A general description of the property of the mortgagor, rather than a specific description of each parcel or item, shall be an adequate description.

(d)

Any such instrument previously recorded or filed in the office of the county recorder or circuit clerk of any county in this state may be rerecorded or refiled in the office of the Secretary of State in the manner provided in this section. The rerecording or refiling thereafter shall be of the same effect as to any property not previously released from the mortgage or deed of trust as if the instrument had been originally recorded or filed in the office of the Secretary of State.

(e)

Any mortgage properly filed in the office of the Secretary of State in accordance with the provisions of this section shall be a lien on the mortgaged property from the time it is filed, and not before.

(f)

Upon the filing of any instrument as provided in this section, there shall also be filed with the recorder of deeds of the county wherein the mortgaged property is situated a brief statement containing the names of the mortgagor and mortgagee and a description of the property. An adequate property description shall consist of language reading substantially as follows: “All property owned by mortgagor and situated in
County, Arkansas.”

(g)

Instruments recorded or filed prior to July 24, 1973, shall not be affected by this section.

(h)

All other laws not in conflict with this section which relate to the time when, or manner or place in which, mortgages, deeds of trust, or instruments supplementary thereto, amendatory thereof, or in satisfaction thereof are filed, executed, or acknowledged or which relate to the manner of endorsement of the record where the instrument is recorded shall be construed to apply to instruments recorded or filed in the office of the Secretary of State pursuant to this section.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 252, §§ 1-3; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 51-1020 — 51-1022.